Utah statutes.
16-4-303.   Service and publication of notice of sale.
(1)  The notice of sale required by Section 16-4-302 shall be:
(a)  personally served on each shareholder whose share is subject to sale; or
(b)  sent by certified mail, return-receipt requested, to each shareholder
whose share is subject to sale at the address shown on the corporation's
records.
(2)  A shareholder is responsible for providing the shareholder's current
mailing address to the corporation for purposes of Subsection (1).
(3)  The notice required by Subsection (1) shall be served or mailed at least
15 days, but not more than 30 days before the day on which the sale is to
occur.
(4)  A notice of sale shall be published:
(a)  once a week for two weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the
location of the corporation's principal place of business beginning at least
15 days but no more than 45 days before the day on which the sale is to occur;
and
(b)  in accordance with Section 45-1-101 for 45 days before the day on which
the sale is to occur.
